Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2465
Bonds; amounts.

An agency may from time to time issue its bonds in such principal amounts as its board shall deem necessary to provide sufficient funds to carry out any of the agency's purposes and powers, including the establishment or increase of reserves, interest accrued during construction of a project and for such period thereafter as the board may determine, and the payment of all other costs or expenses of the agency incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its purposes and powers.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 65.